Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202673-809
Competitive bids; time requirements; waiver; solicitation; form.

(1) A minimum of fifteen days shall elapse between the time formal bids are advertised and the time of their opening, except that this requirement may be waived by the materiel administrator upon a showing by the state agency of an emergency, sole or specialized source, or other unique requirement.

(2) A solicitation shall be in the form of a public notice of the proposed purchase or lease and a general description of the personal property or services needed in a paper of general circulation in the area where the agency will be operating or by any other method approved by the materiel administrator.

Laws 1963, c. 508, § 10, p. 1620;

Laws 1975, LB 447, § 4;

Laws 1981, LB 381, § 6;

Laws 2000, LB 654, § 14;

R.S.1943, (2014), § 81-161.01;

Laws 2024, LB461, § 9.